North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 12H. Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee.

§ 120-70.80.
Creation and membership of Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee.

The Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee is established. The Committee consists of 22 members as follows:

Eleven members of the Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, at least three of whom are members of the minority party; and

Eleven members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, at least three of whom are members of the minority party.

Terms on the Committee are for two years and begin on the convening of the General Assembly in each odd-numbered year. Members may complete a term of service on the Committee even if they do not seek reelection or are not reelected to the General Assembly, but resignation or removal from service in the General Assembly constitutes resignation or removal from service on the Committee.

A member continues to serve until his successor is appointed. A vacancy shall be filled within 30 days by the officer who made the original appointment.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1066, s. 115; 1997-456, s. 46(a); 1997-495, s. 91(a); 1999-431, s. 3.7(a); 2001-486, s. 2.5; 2011-291, s. 1.5(c).

§ 120-70.81.
Purpose and powers of Committee.

The Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee shall examine, on a continuing basis, the several educational institutions in North Carolina, in order to make ongoing recommendations to the General Assembly on ways to improve public education from kindergarten through higher education. In this examination, the Committee may:

Study the budgets, programs, and policies of the Department of Public Instruction, the State Board of Education, the Community Colleges System Office, the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina, and the constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina to determine ways in which the General Assembly may encourage the improvement of all education provided to North Carolinians and may aid in the development of more integrated methods of institutional accountability;

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-126, s. 16, effective July 20, 2017.

Study other states’ educational initiatives in public schools, community colleges, and public universities, in order to provide an ongoing commentary to the General Assembly on these initiatives and to make recommendations for implementing similar initiatives in North Carolina; and

Study any other educational matters that the Committee considers necessary to fulfill its mandate.

Study the needs of children and youth. This study may include, but is not limited to:

Developing strategies for addressing the issues of school dropout, teen suicide, and adolescent pregnancy.

Identifying and evaluating the impact on children and youth of other economic and environmental issues.

The Committee may make interim reports to the General Assembly on matters for which it may report to a regular session of the General Assembly. A report to the General Assembly may contain any legislation needed to implement a recommendation of the Committee.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1066, s. 115; 1999-84, s. 20; 2011-291, s. 1.5(d); 2017-126, s. 16.

Cross References.

As to reports required from the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee to the General Assembly regarding capital facilities, see G.S. 116-13.1(a)(3).

UNC-NCCCS Joint Initiative for Teacher Education and Recruitment.

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 9.3, provides for the development and implementation of a Joint Initiative for Teacher Education and Recruitment. See note at

G.S. 115C-295

.

§ 120-70.82.
Organization of Committee.

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each designate a cochair of the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee. The Committee shall meet at least once a quarter and may meet at other times upon the joint call of the cochairs.

A quorum of the Committee is 10 members. No action may be taken except by a majority vote at a meeting at which a quorum is present. While in the discharge of its official duties, the Committee has the powers of a joint committee under

G.S. 120-19

and

G.S. 120-19

.1 through

G.S. 120-19.4

.

Members of the Committee receive subsistence and travel expenses as provided in

G.S. 120-3.1

. The Committee may contract for consultants or hire employees in accordance with

G.S. 120-32.02

. The Legislative Services Commission, through the Legislative Services Officer, shall assign professional staff to assist the Committee in its work. Upon the direction of the Legislative Services Commission, the Supervisors of Clerks of the Senate and of the House of Representatives shall assign clerical staff to the Committee. The expenses for clerical employees shall be borne by the Committee.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1066, s. 115; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 8(i); 1997-456, s. 46(b); 1997-495, s. 91(b).

§ 120-70.83.
Additional powers.

The Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, while in discharge of official duties, shall have access to any paper or document, and may compel the attendance of any State official or employee before the Committee or secure any evidence under G.S. 120.19. In addition,

G.S. 120-19.1

through

G.S. 120-19.4

shall apply to the proceedings of the Committee as if it were a joint committee of the General Assembly.

History.

1997-18, s. 15(b).

§ 120-70.84.
Reports to the Committee.

By March 1, 2014, and by January 1, 2015, and annually thereafter, Teach for America, Inc., (TFA) shall report to the offices of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Senate Appropriations/Base Budget Committee, the House Appropriations Committee, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Education/Higher Education, the House Appropriations Committee on Education, the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, and the Fiscal Research Division on the operation of its programs under subsection (a) of Section 8.21 of S.L. 2013-360, including at least all of the following information:

The total number of applications received nationally from candidates seeking participation in the program.

The total number of applications received from candidates who are residents of North Carolina and information on the source of these candidates, including the number of (i) recent college graduates and the higher institution the candidates attended, (ii) mid-career level and lateral entry industry professionals, and (iii) veterans of the United States Armed Forces.

The total number of North Carolina candidates accepted by TFA.

The total number of accepted candidates placed in North Carolina, including the number of accepted candidates who are residents of North Carolina.

The regions in which accepted candidates have been placed, the number of candidates in each region, and the number of students impacted by placement in those regions.

Success of recruitment efforts, including the Teach Back Home program and targeting of candidates who are (i) working in areas related to STEM education, (ii) mid-career level and lateral entry industry professionals, and (iii) veterans of the United States Armed Forces.

Success of retention efforts, including the Teach Beyond Two and Make it Home programs, and the percentage of accepted candidates working in their placement communities beyond the initial TFA two-year commitment period and the number of years those candidates teach beyond the initial commitment.

(7a)

The percentage of candidates who are residents of North Carolina and become principals in a North Carolina public school following the initial TFA two-year commitment period.

A financial accounting of how the State funds appropriated to TFA were expended in the previous year, including at least the following information:

Funds expended by region of the State.

Details on program costs, including at least the following:

Recruitment, candidate selection, and placement.

Preservice training and preparation costs.

Operational and administrative costs, including development and fundraising, alumni support, management costs, and marketing and outreach.

Funds received through private fundraising, specifically by sources in each region of the State.

History.

2013-360, s. 8.21(b); 2019-165, s. 3.6(a).

§§ 120-70.85 through 120-70.89.

Reserved for future codification purposes.